Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1750.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Approved hospital” means a hospital approved by the American Osteopathic Association (AOA) or Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME).

“Approved program” means a one-year internship or postgraduate program approved by the AOA or the ACGME.

“Accredited school or college of osteopathic medicine” means a school approved by the AOA or by the Board according to its rules.

“Board” means the Board of Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons created under section 1791 of this title.

“Disciplinary action” includes any action taken by the Board against a person licensed under this chapter or an applicant premised on a finding that the person has engaged in unprofessional conduct. The term includes all sanctions of any kind, including obtaining injunctions, refusing to grant or renew a license, suspending or revoking a license, and issuing warnings.

“Medical director” means, for purposes of this chapter, an osteopathic physician who is board-certified or board-eligible in his or her field of specialty, as determined by the AOA or the American Board of Medical Specialties (ABMS), and who is charged by a health maintenance organization with responsibility for overseeing all clinical activities of the plan in this State, or his or her designee.

“Health maintenance organization”, as used in this section, shall have the same meaning as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 9402(9)

.

“Member” means any individual who has entered into a contract with a health maintenance organization for the provision of health care services, or on whose behalf such an arrangement has been made, as well as the individual’s dependents covered by the contract.

“Osteopathic physician” means a person licensed under this chapter to practice osteopathic medicine.

“Practice of osteopathic medicine” means the diagnosis, treatment, operation, or prescription for any human disease, pain, injury, deformity, or other physical or mental condition, which practice is based in part upon educational standards and requirements that emphasize the importance of the neuromusculoskeletal structure and manipulative treatment in the maintenance and restoration of health.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. June 13, 2002.

§ 1751.
Application of laws; rights.

Osteopathic physicians and surgeons shall be subject to the provisions of law relating to communicable diseases and to the granting of certificates of births and deaths and the issuance of certificates relating to the commitment of individuals with a mental illness, and such reports and certificates shall be accepted by the office or department to whom the same are made or presented, equally with the reports and certificates of physicians of any other school of medicine; and such physicians shall have the same rights with respect to the rendering of medical services under the provisions of public health, welfare, and assistance laws and rules.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 176.

§ 1752.
Prohibition; penalty.

A person shall not perform any of the following acts:

practice or attempt to practice osteopathic medicine or hold himself or herself out as being able to do so in this State without first having obtained a license from the Board;

use in connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia indicating that the person is an osteopathic physician unless the person is licensed in accordance with this chapter;

practice or attempt to practice osteopathic medicine during license revocation or suspension.

A person violating any of the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2007, No. 29

, § 30;

2015, No. 38

, § 15, eff. May 28, 2015.

§ 1753.
Exemptions.

The provisions of subdivision 1752(a)(1) of this title, relating to practice, shall not apply to the following persons acting within the scope of their respective practices:

A person licensed to practice medicine and surgery under chapter 23 of this title.

A person licensed to practice chiropractic medicine under chapter 10 of this title.

A physician assistant licensed or registered pursuant to chapter 31 of this title.

The provisions of subdivision 1752(a)(1) of this title shall not apply to any person or persons giving aid, assistance, or relief in emergency or accident cases, pending the arrival of a licensed physician or surgeon.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

a commissioned officer of the U.S. Armed Forces or Public Health Service when acting within the scope of his or her official duties;

a nonresident licensed osteopathic physician or surgeon who is called to treat or to consult on a particular case in this State, provided he or she does not otherwise practice in this State; or

an osteopathic physician who is duly licensed and in good standing in another state, territory, or jurisdiction of the United States or in Canada if the physician is employed as or formally designated as the team physician by an athletic team visiting Vermont for a specific sporting event and the physician limits the practice of medicine in this State to medical treatment of the members, coaches, and staff of the sports team employing or designating the physician.

HISTORY:

Added

1989, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2013, No. 27

, § 19;

2015, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 10, 2016.